Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-115
Inter vivos conveyance to the heirs or next of kin of the conveyor; effect.

When any property is limited, in an otherwise effective conveyance inter vivos, in form or in effect, to the heirs or next of kin of the conveyor, which conveyance creates one or more prior interests in favor of a person or persons in existence, such conveyance operates in favor of such heirs or next of kin by purchase and not by descent.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 15, p. 597;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1015;

R.S.1943, § 76-115.